Wyoming, session 2025, HB0084.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 11-25-102(a) by creating a new
paragraph (xxiii) and 11-25-201(b)(ii) are amended to read:

11-25-102. Definitions.

(a) As used in this act:

(xxiii) "Breakage" means the odd cents on any
sum otherwise distributable in a pari-mutuel pool.
HB0084

2025 STATE OF WYOMING 25LSO-0053

11-25-201. Pari-mutuel permits; fees and reports;
disposition of funds; enforcement of provisions.

(b) Every Wednesday following any pari-mutuel event,
the permittee shall:

(ii) Pay an amount equal to one-quarter percent
(1/4%) of the total amount wagered attributable to historic
pari-mutuel events and one and one-half percent (1 1/2%) of
the total amount wagered attributable to live pari-mutuel
events, shown by the report to the commission, and an
amount equal to the breakage on historic pari-mutuel events
retained under subsection (c) of this section, to be
credited by the state treasurer to a separate account, in
the manner indicated in subsection (d) of this section;

Section 2. This act is effective July 1, 2025.

(END)
HB0084